Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.070

Duration of conservatorship.

The conservator shall serve for such time as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the conservatorship as intended by this chapter. If rehabilitated, the rehabilitated savings bank shall be returned to management or new managements under such conditions as are reasonable and necessary to prevent recurrence of the condition which occasioned the conservatorship.

[ 2010 c 88 s 72.]